Illinois, session 104th, HB2250.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Domestic Animals Running At Large 5Act is amended by changing Section 5.1 as follows: 6    (510 ILCS 55/5.1)  (from Ch. 8, par. 5.1)7    Sec. 5.1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the "Illinois Domestic Animals Running At Large Act".9(Source: P.A. 84-28.)